District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.225

Authorization for grant-managing entity.

For fiscal years 2014, 2015, and 2016, the Community Foundation for the National Capital Region (“Community Foundation”) is designated as the grant-managing entity. The Community Foundation shall be required to enter into a Memorandum of Understanding (“MOU”) with the District of Columbia government. The MOU shall set forth certain administrative requirements for the Community Foundation to abide by when it obtains District funds and awards subgrants involving District funds, and will clarify and reaffirm the Community Foundation’s responsibility and obligation with respect to District funds, including the monitoring of the use of District funds.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1016, 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-325.221.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1016 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1016 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.